Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB37.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Sections 1308(g)(1.1) and 1602-A(j)(1) of the act of June 3, 1937 (P.L.1333, No.320), known as the Pennsylvania Election Code, are amended to read:Section 1308. Canvassing of Official Absentee Ballots and Mail-in Ballots.--* * *(g) * * *12345678910111213141516171819202122 (1.1) The county board of elections shall meet no earlier than [seven o'clock A.M. on] seven (7) days prior to election day to pre-canvass all ballots received prior to the meeting. A county board of elections shall provide at least forty-eight hours' notice of a pre-canvass meeting by publicly posting a notice of a pre-canvass meeting on its publicly accessible Internet website. One authorized representative of each candidate in an election and one representative from each political party shall be permitted to remain in the room in which the absentee ballots and mail-in ballots are pre-canvassed. No person observing, attending or participating in a pre-canvass meeting may disclose the results of any portion of any pre-canvass meeting prior to the close of the polls.* * *Section 1602-A. Funding for elections.* * *(j) Grant agreement.--The grant agreement between the department and the county under this section shall include the following requirements for counties:[(1) The county shall begin pre-canvassing [at] NO LATER THAN 7 a.m. on election day and shall continue without interruption FROM 7 A.M. ON ELECTION DAY until each mail-in ballot and absentee ballot TIMELY received [by 7 a.m. on election day is pre-canvassed.] IS PRE-CANVASSED.* * *Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB0037PN3191 - 2 - <--<--<--<--1234567891011121314151617181920212223242526